lexd_components/hye-eanc_adj.lexd
խաբեբա:խաբեբա
աներկբա:աներկբա
անապագա:անապագա
հետագա:հետագա
հեռազգա:հեռազգա
լուսազգա:լուսազգա
թերազգա:թերազգա
դյուրազգա:դյուրազգա
անզգա:անզգա
խորզգա:խորզգա
թազա:թազա
անշղթա:անշղթա
աներեխա:աներեխա
արյունընծա:արյունընծա
նորընծա:նորընծա
անենթակա:անենթակա
մերձակա:մերձակա
ինքնակա:ինքնակա
Միջակա:Միջակա
միջակա:միջակա
շրջակա:շրջակա
հեռակա:հեռակա
մոտակա:մոտակա
հարակա:հարակա
տարակա:տարակա
գաղտնագրակա:գաղտնագրակա
գերակա:գերակա
ընթերակա:ընթերակա
վերակա:վերակա
բարձրակա:բարձրակա
բացակա:բացակա
արևկա:արևկա
պարզկա:պարզկա
առաջիկա:առաջիկա
մթնկա:մթնկա
անլուսնկա:անլուսնկա
առկա:առկա
անվկա:անվկա
անառարկա:անառարկա
ներկա:ներկա
աժդահա:աժդահա
ակամա:ակամա
գեղահմա:գեղահմա
հոգեհմա:հոգեհմա
Ավաչինսկայա:Ավաչինսկայա
անագյա:անագյա
ադամանդյա:ադամանդյա
հարդյա:հարդյա
վարդյա:վարդյա
բրդյա:բրդյա
կիսաբրդյա:կիսաբրդյա
կոպտաբրդյա:կոպտաբրդյա
մահուդյա:մահուդյա
բացօդյա:բացօդյա
երկթևյա:երկթևյա
ստևյա:ստևյա
գայլախազյա:գայլախազյա
բեհեզյա:բեհեզյա
բրոնզյա:բրոնզյա
փիրուզյա:փիրուզյա
յոթշաբաթյա:յոթշաբաթյա
միշաբաթյա:միշաբաթյա
երկշաբաթյա:երկշաբաթյա
փսիաթյա:փսիաթյա
արծաթյա:արծաթյա
երկաթյա:երկաթյա
մագաղաթյա:մագաղաթյա
թղթյա:թղթյա
ստվարաթղթյա:ստվարաթղթյա
հակինթյա:հակինթյա
չթյա:չթյա
մեկհերթյա:մեկհերթյա
մորթյա:մորթյա
բացօթյա:բացօթյա
ապառաժյա:ապառաժյա
տոսախյա:տոսախյա
բամբակյա:բամբակյա
կիսաբամբակյա:կիսաբամբակյա
դահանակյա:դահանակյա
միաժամանակյա:միաժամանակյա
վաղաժամանակյա:վաղաժամանակյա
կարճաժամանակյա:կարճաժամանակյա
համաժամանակյա:համաժամանակյա
բազմաժամանակյա:բազմաժամանակյա
տարաժամանակյա:տարաժամանակյա
առժամանակյա:առժամանակյա
երկարժամանակյա:երկարժամանակյա
ապակյա:ապակյա
բյուրեղապակյա:բյուրեղապակյա
հախճապակյա:հախճապակյա
ճենապակյա:ճենապակյա
արծնապակյա:արծնապակյա
դիպակյա:դիպակյա
ընդհատակյա:ընդհատակյա
տախտակյա:տախտակյա
ծաղկյա:ծաղկյա
երկփեղկյա:երկփեղկյա
մաշկյա:մաշկյա
ընդմաշկյա:ընդմաշկյա
տատասկյա:տատասկյա
ոսկյա:ոսկյա
պարթևանձյա:պարթևանձյա
պղնձյա:պղնձյա
անագապղնձյա:անագապղնձյա
թաղյա:թաղյա
յոթնաղյա:յոթնաղյա
մետաղյա:մետաղյա
երկմետաղյա:երկմետաղյա
թիթեղյա:թիթեղյա
բյուրեղյա:բյուրեղյա
երկտողյա:երկտողյա
ըստտողյա:ըստտողյա
վերտողյա:վերտողյա
վեցփողյա:վեցփողյա
միջգյուղյա:միջգյուղյա
շափյուղյա:շափյուղյա
կաճյա:կաճյա
խճյա:խճյա
կավճյա:կավճյա
ամյա:ամյա
քսանհինգամյա:քսանհինգամյա
տասնհինգամյա:տասնհինգամյա
երեսունհինգամյա:երեսունհինգամյա
հնգամյա:հնգամյա
տասնյոթամյա:տասնյոթամյա
ութամյա:ութամյա
տասնութամյա:տասնութամյա
արտաժամյա:արտաժամյա
յոթժամյա:յոթժամյա
ութժամյա:ութժամյա
երկժամյա:երկժամյա
առժամյա:առժամյա
կեսժամյա:կեսժամյա
չորսժամյա:չորսժամյա
վեցժամյա:վեցժամյա
միամյա:միամյա
մեկամյա:մեկամյա
երկամյա:երկամյա
բազմամյա:բազմամյա
քսանամյա:քսանամյա
ամենամյա:ամենամյա
յոթնամյա:յոթնամյա
հնամյա:հնամյա
իննամյա:իննամյա
տասնիննամյա:տասնիննամյա
յոթանասնամյա:յոթանասնամյա
քառասնամյա:քառասնամյա
տասնամյա:տասնամյա
երեսնամյա:երեսնամյա
հիսնամյա:հիսնամյա
յոթանասունամյա:յոթանասունամյա
երեսունամյա:երեսունամյա
վաթսունամյա:վաթսունամյա
ութսունամյա:ութսունամյա
իննսունամյա:իննսունամյա
քառամյա:քառամյա
եռամյա:եռամյա
կիսամյա:կիսամյա
չորսամյա:չորսամյա
տասնչորսամյա:տասնչորսամյա
սակավամյա:սակավամյա
հազարամյա:հազարամյա
երկհազարամյա:երկհազարամյա
երկարամյա:երկարամյա
հարյուրամյա:հարյուրամյա
հինգհարյուրամյա:հինգհարյուրամյա
ութհարյուրամյա:ութհարյուրամյա
երկհարյուրամյա:երկհարյուրամյա
չորսհարյուրամյա:չորսհարյուրամյա
վեցհարյուրամյա:վեցհարյուրամյա
վեցամյա:վեցամյա
տասնվեցամյա:տասնվեցամյա
տասներկուամյա:տասներկուամյա
երեքամյա:երեքամյա
տասներեքամյա:տասներեքամյա
երեքժանյա:երեքժանյա
հարյուրաստիճանյա:հարյուրաստիճանյա
եղեգնյա:եղեգնյա
եղևնյա:եղևնյա
վեհազնյա:վեհազնյա
քաջազնյա:քաջազնյա
մերազնյա:մերազնյա
դժնյա:դժնյա
սևակնյա:սևակնյա
շողակնյա:շողակնյա
յոթնակնյա:յոթնակնյա
սրակնյա:սրակնյա
բյուրակնյա:բյուրակնյա
միանձնյա:միանձնյա
վեհանձնյա:վեհանձնյա
յոթդռնյա:յոթդռնյա
ստորլեռնյա:ստորլեռնյա
ութամասնյա:ութամասնյա
բազմամասնյա:բազմամասնյա
քառամասնյա:քառամասնյա
եռամասնյա:եռամասնյա
հինգմասնյա:հինգմասնյա
երկմասնյա:երկմասնյա
ենթալուսնյա:ենթալուսնյա
ընդլուսնյա:ընդլուսնյա
շուրջլուսնյա:շուրջլուսնյա
վեցմատնյա:վեցմատնյա
տասներկումատնյա:տասներկումատնյա
ներգետնյա:ներգետնյա
վերգետնյա:վերգետնյա
ստորգետնյա:ստորգետնյա
հնգոտնյա:հնգոտնյա
ութոտնյա:ութոտնյա
մաշկոտնյա:մաշկոտնյա
քառոտնյա:քառոտնյա
եռոտնյա:եռոտնյա
հարյուրոտնյա:հարյուրոտնյա
վեցոտնյա:վեցոտնյա
գործունյա:գործունյա
կենսագործունյա:կենսագործունյա
անգործունյա:անգործունյա
դափնյա:դափնյա
ձախափնյա:ձախափնյա
մերձափնյա:մերձափնյա
լճափնյա:լճափնյա
աջափնյա:աջափնյա
առափնյա:առափնյա
ծովափնյա:ծովափնյա
գետափնյա:գետափնյա
ջրափնյա:ջրափնյա
կաշյա:կաշյա
ետճաշյա:ետճաշյա
հետճաշյա:հետճաշյա
զամշյա:զամշյա
վշյա:վշյա
թավշյա:թավշյա
կիսաթավշյա:կիսաթավշյա
շղարշյա:շղարշյա
փշյա:փշյա
սևաչյա:սևաչյա
արևաչյա:արևաչյա
եզաչյա:եզաչյա
հեզաչյա:հեզաչյա
խաժաչյա:խաժաչյա
միաչյա:միաչյա
շլաչյա:շլաչյա
թխաչյա:թխաչյա
մեծաչյա:մեծաչյա
գեղաչյա:գեղաչյա
շեղաչյա:շեղաչյա
եզնաչյա:եզնաչյա
յոթնաչյա:յոթնաչյա
գորշաչյա:գորշաչյա
պայծառաչյա:պայծառաչյա
լուսաչյա:լուսաչյա
կապտաչյա:կապտաչյա
կապուտաչյա:կապուտաչյա
հազարաչյա:հազարաչյա
հրաչյա:հրաչյա
կարմրաչյա:կարմրաչյա
խոշորաչյա:խոշորաչյա
սրաչյա:սրաչյա
բյուրաչյա:բյուրաչյա
հարյուրաչյա:հարյուրաչյա
բոցաչյա:բոցաչյա
հավատչյա:հավատչյա
անտառամիջյա:անտառամիջյա
շուրջբևեռյա:շուրջբևեռյա
վեցդասյա:վեցդասյա
կերպասյա:կերպասյա
հնգամսյա:հնգամսյա
յոթամսյա:յոթամսյա
ութամսյա:ութամսյա
միամսյա:միամսյա
մեկամսյա:մեկամսյա
երկամսյա:երկամսյա
ամենամսյա:ամենամսյա
յոթնամսյա:յոթնամսյա
իննամսյա:իննամսյա
տասնամսյա:տասնամսյա
քառամսյա:քառամսյա
եռամսյա:եռամսյա
կիսամսյա:կիսամսյա
չորսամսյա:չորսամսյա
ըստամսյա:ըստամսյա
վեցամսյա:վեցամսյա
եբենոսյա:եբենոսյա
էբենոսյա:էբենոսյա
սնդուսյա:սնդուսյա
աղյուսյա:աղյուսյա
կիսամետաքսյա:կիսամետաքսյա
կտավյա:կտավյա
ընդլեզվյա:ընդլեզվյա
ընդծովյա:ընդծովյա
ասվյա:ասվյա
պրտվյա:պրտվյա
ագատյա:ագատյա
ընդդատյա:ընդդատյա
պողպատյա:պողպատյա
պողովատյա:պողովատյա
միջգետյա:միջգետյա
գրանիտյա:գրանիտյա
զմրուխտյա:զմրուխտյա
փայտյա:փայտյա
քառադաշտյա:քառադաշտյա
վեցադաշտյա:վեցադաշտյա
յոթդաշտյա:յոթդաշտյա
վեցդաշտյա:վեցդաշտյա
ընդծնոտյա:ընդծնոտյա
ալմաստյա:ալմաստյա
մարգարտյա:մարգարտյա
բազմադարյա:բազմադարյա
երկդարյա:երկդարյա
կեսդարյա:կեսդարյա
երեքդարյա:երեքդարյա
փշալարյա:փշալարյա
մարմարյա:մարմարյա
կապարյա:կապարյա
քարյա:քարյա
որձաքարյա:որձաքարյա
կրաքարյա:կրաքարյա
կղմինդրյա:կղմինդրյա
ծովեզերյա:ծովեզերյա
եղջերյա:եղջերյա
ծովեզրյա:ծովեզրյա
գետեզրյա:գետեզրյա
ճամփեզրյա:ճամփեզրյա
ոսկրյա:ոսկրյա
ընդոսկրյա:ընդոսկրյա
ընդերկրյա:ընդերկրյա
այլերկրյա:այլերկրյա
միջերկրյա:միջերկրյա
շուրջերկրյա:շուրջերկրյա
արտերկրյա:արտերկրյա
տարերկրյա:տարերկրյա
օտարերկրյա:օտարերկրյա
անդրերկրյա:անդրերկրյա
վերերկրյա:վերերկրյա
ստորերկրյա:ստորերկրյա
փղոսկրկրյա:փղոսկրկրյա
արույրյա:արույրյա
ընդջրյա:ընդջրյա
վերջրյա:վերջրյա
խորջրյա:խորջրյա
ստորջրյա:ստորջրյա
ալաբաստրյա:ալաբաստրյա
սամուրյա:սամուրյա
եղջյուրյա:եղջյուրյա
պորփյուրյա:պորփյուրյա
փետուրյա:փետուրյա
հնգօրյա:հնգօրյա
հանապազօրյա:հանապազօրյա
շաբաթօրյա:շաբաթօրյա
ութօրյա:ութօրյա
միօրյա:միօրյա
մեկօրյա:մեկօրյա
երկօրյա:երկօրյա
վաղօրյա:վաղօրյա
բազմօրյա:բազմօրյա
քսանօրյա:քսանօրյա
ամենօրյա:ամենօրյա
յոթնօրյա:յոթնօրյա
կիրակնօրյա:կիրակնօրյա
հնօրյա:հնօրյա
իննօրյա:իննօրյա
քառասնօրյա:քառասնօրյա
տասնօրյա:տասնօրյա
երեսնօրյա:երեսնօրյա
հիսնօրյա:հիսնօրյա
մեջօրյա:մեջօրյա
շուրջօրյա:շուրջօրյա
առօրյա:առօրյա
քառօրյա:քառօրյա
եռօրյա:եռօրյա
եռօրյա:եռօրյա
կեսօրյա:կեսօրյա
հետկեսօրյա:հետկեսօրյա
կիսօրյա:կիսօրյա
ամսօրյա:ամսօրյա
չորսօրյա:չորսօրյա
սակավօրյա:սակավօրյա
ըստօրյա:ըստօրյա
երկարօրյա:երկարօրյա
մերօրյա:մերօրյա
նորօրյա:նորօրյա
վեցօրյա:վեցօրյա
երեքօրյա:երեքօրյա
սադափյա:սադափյա
սատափյա:սատափյա
կանեփյա:կանեփյա
թաղիքյա:թաղիքյա
բարձրագնա:բարձրագնա
ծանրագնա:ծանրագնա
անխնա:անխնա
մահամնա:մահամնա
ուշամնա:ուշամնա
սրտամնա:սրտամնա
սասնա:սասնա
քոսա:քոսա
անմուսա:անմուսա
անլվա:անլվա
արյունլվա:արյունլվա
ուտիսվա:ուտիսվա
վաղուցվա:վաղուցվա
աշկարա:աշկարա
ավարա:ավարա
տակնուվրա:տակնուվրա
համփա:համփա
եքա:եքա
զարբաբ:զարբաբ
մարդախաբ:մարդախաբ
զգայախաբ:զգայախաբ
սատանախաբ:սատանախաբ
հուսախաբ:հուսախաբ
դյուրախաբ:դյուրախաբ
անխաբ:անխաբ
բազմաժառանգ:բազմաժառանգ
անժառանգ:անժառանգ
բազմավտանգ:բազմավտանգ
անվտանգ:անվտանգ
վարդերանգ:վարդերանգ
ոսկեերանգ:ոսկեերանգ
միերանգ:միերանգ
բալերանգ:բալերանգ
թխերանգ:թխերանգ
շագանակերանգ:շագանակերանգ
սպիտակերանգ:սպիտակերանգ
ոսկերանգ:ոսկերանգ
համերանգ:համերանգ
բազմերանգ:բազմերանգ
ցորեներանգ:ցորեներանգ
յոթներանգ:յոթներանգ
դեղներանգ:դեղներանգ
նույներանգ:նույներանգ
ձյուներանգ:ձյուներանգ
արյուներանգ:արյուներանգ
երփներանգ:երփներանգ
գորշերանգ:գորշերանգ
կանաչերանգ:կանաչերանգ
նարնջերանգ:նարնջերանգ
պայծառերանգ:պայծառերանգ
լուսերանգ:լուսերանգ
ծովերանգ:ծովերանգ
խայտերանգ:խայտերանգ
կապտերանգ:կապտերանգ
հազարերանգ:հազարերանգ
կարմրերանգ:կարմրերանգ
բոսորերանգ:բոսորերանգ
նախահոգ:նախահոգ
բազմահոգ:բազմահոգ
ունայնահոգ:ունայնահոգ
մտահոգ:մտահոգ
մշտահոգ:մշտահոգ
յուրահոգ:յուրահոգ
անհոգ:անհոգ
ոռոգ:ոռոգ
լուսոռոգ:լուսոռոգ
ջրոռոգ:ջրոռոգ
նորոգ:նորոգ
աշխարհանորոգ:աշխարհանորոգ
բարենորոգ:բարենորոգ
մեծահարգ:մեծահարգ
արժանահարգ:արժանահարգ
ցածրահարգ:ցածրահարգ
բարձրահարգ:բարձրահարգ
անարգ:անարգ
պղերգ:պղերգ
ռաշիդ:ռաշիդ
գայլախեղդ:գայլախեղդ
ծխախեղդ:ծխախեղդ
բկախեղդ:բկախեղդ
մահախեղդ:մահախեղդ
ձայնախեղդ:ձայնախեղդ
ձյունախեղդ:ձյունախեղդ
կիսախեղդ:կիսախեղդ
արտասվախեղդ:արտասվախեղդ
ջրախեղդ:ջրախեղդ
բքախեղդ:բքախեղդ
արցունքախեղդ:արցունքախեղդ
խոսքախեղդ:խոսքախեղդ
ձագխեղդ:ձագխեղդ
փոշեխեղդ:փոշեխեղդ
քարխեղդ:քարխեղդ
հողդողդ:հողդողդ
անհողդողդ:անհողդողդ
հնազանդ:հնազանդ
դյուրահնազանդ:դյուրահնազանդ
անհնազանդ:անհնազանդ
զարզանդ:զարզանդ
անկաշկանդ:անկաշկանդ
հարհանդ:հարհանդ
այլաղանդ:այլաղանդ
բազմաղանդ:բազմաղանդ
մեծատաղանդ:մեծատաղանդ
բարձրատաղանդ:բարձրատաղանդ
անտաղանդ:անտաղանդ
չարաղանդ:չարաղանդ
ոսկեճարմանդ:ոսկեճարմանդ
մարմանդ:մարմանդ
հորդեռանդ:հորդեռանդ
փութեռանդ:փութեռանդ
մոլեռանդ:մոլեռանդ
ջերմեռանդ:ջերմեռանդ
անեռանդ:անեռանդ
սրտեռանդ:սրտեռանդ
բազմավարսանդ:բազմավարսանդ
սրբավանդ:սրբավանդ
արգավանդ:արգավանդ
անարգավանդ:անարգավանդ
մարգարեավանդ:մարգարեավանդ
առաքելավանդ:առաքելավանդ
աստվածավանդ:աստվածավանդ
հայավանդ:հայավանդ
եբրայավանդ:եբրայավանդ
հայրենավանդ:հայրենավանդ
նախնավանդ:նախնավանդ
երկնավանդ:երկնավանդ
հնավանդ:հնավանդ
հայրավանդ:հայրավանդ
նորավանդ:նորավանդ
հիվանդ:հիվանդ
կիսահիվանդ:կիսահիվանդ
աշխարհաքանդ:աշխարհաքանդ
տնաքանդ:տնաքանդ
կիսաքանդ:կիսաքանդ
կարքանդ:կարքանդ
քարուքանդ:քարուքանդ
լիախինդ:լիախինդ
ծիծաղախինդ:ծիծաղախինդ
քինախինդ:քինախինդ
արյունախինդ:արյունախինդ
կենսախինդ:կենսախինդ
սրտախինդ:սրտախինդ
չարախինդ:չարախինդ
անխինդ:անխինդ
փոխինդ:փոխինդ
գմբեթարդ:գմբեթարդ
կորնթարդ:կորնթարդ
անկյունարդ:անկյունարդ
սառցաջարդ:սառցաջարդ
երիտասարդ:երիտասարդ
ավելորդ:ավելորդ
ձախորդ:ձախորդ
նախորդ:նախորդ
լծորդ:լծորդ
շարժահաղորդ:շարժահաղորդ
կրակահաղորդ:կրակահաղորդ
ջերմահաղորդ:ջերմահաղորդ
լայնահաղորդ:լայնահաղորդ
ձայնահաղորդ:ձայնահաղորդ
հնչյունահաղորդ:հնչյունահաղորդ
դժվարահաղորդ:դժվարահաղորդ
սիրահաղորդ:սիրահաղորդ
էլեկտրահաղորդ:էլեկտրահաղորդ
դյուրահաղորդ:դյուրահաղորդ
անհաղորդ:անհաղորդ
մեծադղորդ:մեծադղորդ
ահադղորդ:ահադղորդ
աշխարհադղորդ:աշխարհադղորդ
ահեղադղորդ:ահեղադղորդ
ահագնադղորդ:ահագնադղորդ
երկնադղորդ:երկնադղորդ
ուղղորդ:ուղղորդ
անկամորդ:անկամորդ
հաջորդ:հաջորդ
քանիերորդ:քանիերորդ
անմնացորդ:անմնացորդ
համակցորդ:համակցորդ
անհագուրդ:անհագուրդ
ջարդուխուրդ:ջարդուխուրդ
անխառնուրդ:անխառնուրդ
կիսամահուդ:կիսամահուդ
անօդ:անօդ
վատօդ:վատօդ
անագե:անագե
գորգե:գորգե
նդե:նդե
ադամանդե:ադամանդե
էնդե:էնդե
ընդե:ընդե
ծառազարդե:ծառազարդե
հարդե:հարդե
վարդե:վարդե
բրդե:բրդե
կիսաբրդե:կիսաբրդե
կոպտաբրդե:կոպտաբրդե
մահուդե:մահուդե
ստևե:ստևե
գայլախազե:գայլախազե
մազե:մազե
ուղտամազե:ուղտամազե
բյազե:բյազե
ավազե:ավազե
բեհեզե:բեհեզե
ընկույզե:ընկույզե
բրոնզե:բրոնզե
ընկուզե:ընկուզե
փիրուզե:փիրուզե
փսիաթե:փսիաթե
լաթե:լաթե
մաշկալաթե:մաշկալաթե
մոմլաթե:մոմլաթե
արծաթե:արծաթե
երկաթե:երկաթե
մագաղաթե:մագաղաթե
սաթե:սաթե
թղթե:թղթե
ստվարաթղթե:ստվարաթղթե
հակինթե:հակինթե
չթե:չթե
մորթե:մորթե
ձյութե:ձյութե
ապառաժե:ապառաժե
շալե:շալե
հախճասալե:հախճասալե
բմբուլե:բմբուլե
կարակուլե:կարակուլե
տոսախե:տոսախե
ցախե:ցախե
քերծե:քերծե
խծուծե:խծուծե
բամբակե:բամբակե
կիսաբամբակե:կիսաբամբակե
արևակե:արևակե
ելակե:ելակե
կայծակե:կայծակե
դահանակե:դահանակե
ապակե:ապակե
բյուրեղապակե:բյուրեղապակե
հախճապակե:հախճապակե
դիպակե:դիպակե
տախտակե:տախտակե
սուտակե:սուտակե
սեկե:սեկե
ծաղկե:ծաղկե
ցինկե:ցինկե
խնկե:խնկե
մաշկե:մաշկե
փոկե:փոկե
տատասկե:տատասկե
ոսկե:ոսկե
կաուչուկե:կաուչուկե
պղնձե:պղնձե
անագապղնձե:անագապղնձե
բրնձե:բրնձե
մետաղե:մետաղե
թիթեղե:թիթեղե
փայլաթիթեղե:փայլաթիթեղե
ասեղե:ասեղե
բյուրեղե:բյուրեղե
հողե:հողե
շափյուղե:շափյուղե
կաճե:կաճե
կավիճե:կավիճե
արճճե:արճճե
կավճե:կավճե
լուսնակուճե:լուսնակուճե
պարկուճե:պարկուճե
դդմե:դդմե
ճմե:ճմե
մոմե:մոմե
մեղրամոմե:մեղրամոմե
աբրեշումե:աբրեշումե
քաթանե:քաթանե
ճոպանե:ճոպանե
չվանե:չվանե
պարանե:պարանե
գերանե:գերանե
խցանե:խցանե
